Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB100.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 29A IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The Administrative Office of the Courts, in cooperation with the Cabinet for
Health and Family Services, shall:
(a) Develop a brochure, pamphlet, or other brief document that contains
information for a juror who has been traumatized by his or her time serving
on a jury regarding how to obtain mental health treatment. The brochure,
pamphlet, or other brief document shall include information regarding how
to access the provider directory maintained by the Cabinet for Health and
Family Services; and
(b) Distribute the brochure, pamphlet, or other brief document described in
paragraph (a) of this subsection to each circuit clerk.
(2) At the conclusion of all jury trials in the Commonwealth involving an offense
that would classify a person as a violent offender under KRS 439.3401, the trial
judge, or the judge's designee, shall provide each juror with the brochure,
pamphlet, or other brief document described in subsection (1) of this section.
(3) A trial judge, or the judge's designee, may provide the brochure, pamphlet, or
other brief document described in subsection (1) of this section at the conclusion
of any trial, if in the judge's discretion, he or she believes a juror may have been
traumatized by his or her service.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 1/3/2025 8:00 AM Jacketed